Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2606
Definitions; where found.

For the purpose of sections 44-2606 to 44-2635, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 44-2607 to 44-2613 shall be used.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 203.